Utah statutes.
53A-17a-139.   Loss in student enrollment -- Board action.

To avoid penalizing a school district financially for an excessive loss in student enrollment due to factors beyond its control, the State Board of Education may allow a percentage increase in units otherwise allowable during any year when a district's average daily membership drops more than 4% below the average for the highest two of the preceding three years in the district.

